Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 4 Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System
Subchapter 5
— Credited Service and Eligibility for Benefits

Cross References.

Law enforcement officers, effect of emergency duty on benefits, § 12-75-130.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 17: Mar. 7, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that the establishment of a State Employees Retirement System is necessary in order to retain and recruit efficient and skilled state employees and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary in order that the Board of Trustees herein created be appointed, organize and establish the necessary rules and forms to be followed upon the establishment of the retirement system herein created on July 1, 1957. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1959, No. 42, § 16: Feb. 13, 1959. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that the coverage of county employees in a retirement system is necessary in order to retain and recruit efficient and skilled county employees; that the coverage is best obtained by including the county employees in the membership of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System, established by Act 177 of 1957, as amended; that it is necessary for the Board of Trustees of said Arkansas State Employees Retirement System to organize and establish necessary rules, regulations and forms to effectuate said coverage of county employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1965, No. 153, § 15: Mar. 9, 1965. Emergency clause provided: “This act shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1967, No. 308, § 4: Became law without Governor's signature, Mar. 13, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential to the efficient operation of good government that qualified employees be recruited and retained; that a liberal retirement system is conducive to retaining such qualified employees; that the giving of a prior service credit will encourage employees to continue in the State's service; that it is necessary for the Board of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System to draft special forms and institute new procedures in order to implement the terms of this Act; and that it is necessary, in order to assure the retention and recruitment of skilled employees, that this Act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary to the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 228, § 3: Mar. 10, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the providing of reasonable and adequate retirement benefits for members of the General Assembly is essential to encourage qualified citizens of this State to seek election to serve in the General Assembly; that the existing provisions of the State Employees Retirement Law deprive members of the House and Senate who have long tenure in the General Assembly of receiving benefits commensurate with the benefits of members having fewer years of service; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to correct this situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 313, § 5: Became law without Governor's signature, Mar. 25, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a number of the members of the State Employees Retirement System have not obtained credited service in the retirement system for prior service rendered as a State or County employee and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to enable such employees to obtain necessary credit and to pay such necessary contribution therefor. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 586, § 11: Became law without Governor's signature, Apr. 3, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that provisions of this act clarify coverage, service, credits, and eligibility for benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System; and, in order to enable those persons who are eligible for such coverage, service credits, or benefits thereunder to obtain such without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 907, § 22: Apr. 7, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that provisions of this Act clarify coverage, service credits, and eligibility for benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System; and in order to enable those persons who are eligible for such coverage, service credits, or benefits thereunder to obtain such without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 663, § 8: Mar. 23, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that provisions of this Act clarify coverage, service credits, and eligibility for benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System; and in order to enable those persons who are eligible for such coverage, service credits, or benefits thereunder to obtain such without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 210, § 6: Feb. 23, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that some county elected constitutional officers in the State served in the armed forces of the United States prior to their election as a county officer; that it is appropriate that such officials who are serving as county elected constitutional officers on the effective date of this Act be permitted to purchase county elected constitutional officer credited service in the Public Employees Retirement System for up to two (2) years of such military service; that this Act is designed to authorize such purchase and to prescribe the procedure therefor, and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 592, § 5: Became law without Governor's signature, Mar. 19, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under the present law, municipalities are authorized to withdraw from the Public Employees Retirement System and to establish their own retirement system; that some municipalities have withdrawn and upon withdrawal, the employee and employer contributions to the System after making certain adjustments for accrued liabilities to the System are returned to the municipality and/or the respective employees and the employee's credited service in the system is forfeited; that in many instances employees of such withdrawing municipalities withdraw from the Public Employees Retirement System; that some of such employees are subsequently employed by another participating public employer and are required to again become a member of the Public Employees Retirement System and the present law is not clear with respect to the right of such employees to have their forfeited credited service reinstated; that this Act is designed to assure this right to such employees and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 859, § 19: Mar. 28, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of Act 177 of 1957, as amended, need further clarification in order for their meaning to be comprehensible to members of the system and administrators. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 757, § 6: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the state agencies and the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System; that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 1093, § 6: Apr. 13, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that immediate passage and approval of this act is necessary to render finality to annuity determinations made by the Public Employees Retirement System Board and to prevent the hardship and instability that results from the recoupment of the overpayments of incorrectly calculated annuity payments to retired State employees for a protracted period of time. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 882, § 5: Apr. 3, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain members of the Public Employees' Retirement System are being denied retirement service credit due to lost time at work from disabling diseases or physical injuries through no fault of their own; that this restriction is inequitable and should be changed to allow those employees to purchase the service credit for the equivalent amount of that leave without pay time; and that this restriction should be removed as soon as practicable to avoid an undue hardship to injured public employees. Therefore, in order to reduce the inequities of the Public Employees' Retirement System, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 962, § 6: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the certain members of the Public Employees' Retirement System are being denied retirement service credit due to work-related injuries through no fault of their own; that this restriction is inequitable and should be changed to allow those employees to recover the service credit for that time; and that this restriction should be removed as soon as practicable without delay in order to avoid an undue hardship to retiring public employees. Therefore, in order to reduce the inequities of the Public Employees' Retirement System, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1999, No. 325, § 17: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that certain provisions of the law governing the Public Employees Retirement System need to be amended concerning eligibility, death benefits, and disability benefits, and that the effective administration of state government makes it necessary for these changes to begin at the start of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 870, § 6: Mar. 25, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that Act 846 of 1995 permitted elected count sheriffs who are retirants in the state police retirement system to accumulate credited service in the Public Employees' Retirement System; that the act failed to provide for the purchase of prior service; and that this has caused an inequity that should be immediately corrected. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1460, § 6: Apr. 15, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to members of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System it is necessary for this act to become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 69: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes technical corrections to a number of sections of Arkansas Code Title 24; that other legislation of this session of the General Assembly may also amend some of those sections; that this act should become effective immediately so that other legislation may be amended to reflect the technical corrections made by this act and to avoid conflicts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 154, § 3: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the thirty-day requirement for termination of employment applies to all members of the Public Employees' Retirement System; that members of the retirement system earn service credit at different rates; that the same requirement for termination of employment is inequitable and this change must be implemented to correct that inequity; and this act should therefore have immediate effect. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1297, § 3: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that early retirement penalties for the Public Employees' Retirement System are overly harsh, that incentives for public employees to retire will improve staff morale and the working environment, and that the beginning of the fiscal year is the most advantageous time to implement benefit changes with the Public Employees' Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2005, No. 652, § 3: Mar. 7, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there are elected public officials that are eligible for retirement from that office but run for public office in another form of government; that once a retiree begins receiving retirement benefits current law requires a break in service before assuming another elected office; and that this act will allow an elected public official in one form of government to retire and to begin serving as an elected official in another form of government without a break in service. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 657, § 2: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the country is in a recession, that the state retirement systems have suffered from the failing economy, that increasing the time period that a member must be terminated from employment in order not to rescind his or her retirement benefits will benefit the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, and that it is considered sound public policy to increase this time period. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2011, No. 38, § 11: Feb. 16, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the public retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 40, § 2: Feb. 16, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that recent reports indicate that some members of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System were merely taking themselves off of the payroll for the specified period of time while continuing to perform their duties so that they could draw retirement in addition to their wages; that clarification is needed to prevent this from happening; and that this clarification is needed immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 563, § 2: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the nation is in an economic downturn; that the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System has suffered significant losses in its portfolio; that allowing elected public officials to accrue two (2) years of service for every year worked costs the system additional funds; and that all other employees in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System receive one (1) year of service for every year worked. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2011, No. 774, § 2: Mar. 30, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the state retirement systems have suffered from recent economic conditions; that increasing the time period that a member must be terminated from employment in order not to rescind his or her retirement benefits will benefit the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System; that it is sound public policy to increase this time period; and that this act is immediately necessary to avoid further depletion of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System assets. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) the date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 288, § 2: Jan. 1, 2014.

Acts 2013, No. 332, § 13: Mar. 14, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is vital that the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System be permitted to immediately implement policies regarding the termination of employment, eligibility of employees to receive benefits, availability of information, and when to pay interest on employee contributions; and to clarify the meaning of terms in the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated to avoid the undue consumption of the system's resources. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

24-4-501. Prior service credit generally — Straight life annuity.

Any member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who became a member of the system on July 1, 1957, in the case of a state employee, or who became a member of the system on July 1, 1959, in the case of a county employee, and who was continuously employed by a public employer to June 8, 1961, upon application and submission of proper proof to the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, as authorized by this chapter, may receive prior service credit for any service rendered a public employer, as defined in § 24-4-101, in the State of Arkansas in a position covered by some other existing retirement system of this state authorized by law, other than Social Security.

Prior service credit may be received only if the member does not have standing to his or her credit in the other retirement system for the same period of time and is no longer a member of, or eligible for membership in, or receiving benefits from, the other retirement system or systems.

Any active member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who would otherwise be eligible for free prior service credit under the provisions of this chapter because of employment with a public employer or with the public schools but who was drafted and was serving in the military on active duty on a date which would have made the member eligible for the free prior service had the member been an employee on that date shall receive, upon application and submission of proper proof to the board, free prior service credit for employment prior to July 1, 1957, in the case of a state, municipal, or school employee, or prior to July 1, 1959, in the case of a county employee, if the following conditions are met:

The member was an employee of a public employer immediately preceding his or her involuntary service in the armed forces; and

The member was reemployed as an employee within six (6) months of his or her discharge from the United States Armed Forces.

For the purposes of this subsection, prior service credit eligibility dates are:

July 1, 1957, for state employees;

July 1, 1959, for county employees;

October 1, 1957, and October 1, 1965, for school employees;

July 1, 1957, and January 1, 1963, for colleges and universities; or

The date the employer begins participation in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, for municipalities.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 119, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2522, 12-2523; Acts 1987, No. 32, § 1; 2001, No. 151, § 21.

24-4-502 — 24-4-506. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning credit for prior service as public school teacher; military service credit generally; military service credit for elected county constitutional officers; actuarial valuation of impact of military service credit; provision for unfunded liability deficit; and restoration of credited service to employee of withdrawing municipality upon subsequent covered employment, were repealed by Acts 1997, No. 299, § 26. They were derived from the following sources:

24-4-502. Acts 1967, No. 308, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2547, 12-2548.

24-4-503. Acts 1947, No. 56, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2323 — 12-2325.

24-4-504. Acts 1979, No. 210, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2524.7 — 12-2524.9.

24-4-505. Acts 1979, No. 210, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2524.10.

24-4-506. Acts 1981, No. 592, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2506.8, 12-2506.9.

24-4-507. Eligibility for benefits — Credited service.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall determine, by appropriate rules consistent with the provisions of this chapter, the amount of service to be credited any member for any fiscal year.

For periods of time prior to July 1, 1991, in no case shall less than ten (10) days of service rendered by a member in any calendar month be credited as a month of service, nor shall less than eleven (11) months of service rendered by a member in any fiscal year be credited as a year of service unless the member is employed by the Arkansas School for the Blind or the Arkansas School for the Deaf, the state colleges and universities, or the public schools of the state, in which case nine (9) months would constitute a year of credited service.

For periods of time prior to July 1, 1991, in no case can less than nine (9) months of service rendered in any fiscal year be credited as a full year of service, nor shall more than one (1) year of service be credited any member for all service rendered by him or her in a fiscal year.

Beginning July 1, 1992, and thereafter, service rendered by a member in any calendar month shall be credited as service based upon the member's number of hours of service in that month and in accordance with the following schedule:

Beginning July 1, 1991, in no case shall less than eleven (11) months of service rendered by a member in any fiscal year be credited as a full year of service, except that the minimum shall be lowered to nine (9) months for a member whose covered employment is employment with the Arkansas School for the Blind or the Arkansas School for the Deaf, the state colleges and universities, or the public schools.

Any member who retires on or after July 1, 1999, shall receive six (6) months of service credit for each full semester of service rendered in any fiscal year for covered employment with the Arkansas School for the Blind or the Arkansas School for the Deaf, the state colleges and universities, or the public schools of the state.

Prior service credits shall not be granted to any member who did not become a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System on the date his or her public employer became a participating public employer, nor shall current service credit be granted any member for any period of time not covered by accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

A member's credited service shall include periods of time, not to exceed a total of five (5) years, during which the member's employment with a public employer was, or is, interrupted due to service rendered by him or her in the United States Armed Forces during a national emergency, but only if:

The person was, or is, an employee of a public employer at the time he or she entered, or enters the armed services;

The person was, or is, reemployed by a public employer within six (6) years from and after the termination of the armed service required of him or her; and

The person returns to the members' deposit account the amounts withdrawn by him or her, together with regular interest from the date of withdrawal to the date of repayment.

In any case of doubt as to the period to be so credited any member, the board shall have the final power to determine the period.

During the period of a member's armed service and until his or her return to the employ of a public employer, a member's contributions to the system shall be suspended.

In no case shall the period of armed service be included in computing a member's average compensation.

Eighty (80) or more hours of service
One (1) month Sixty (60) hours up to less than eighty (80) hours
Three-fourths (¾) month Forty (40) hours up to less than sixty (60) hours
One-half (½) month Twenty (20) hours up to less than forty (40) hours
One-quarter (¼) month Less than twenty (20) hours
No credit.

Click to view form.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 10; 1959, No. 42, § 10; 1965, No. 153, §§ 9, 10; 1969, No. 313, § 3; 1975, No. 907, § 6; 1981, No. 859, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2510; Acts 1991, No. 757, § 1; 1999, No. 325, § 7; 2001, No. 151, § 22; 2011, No. 38, § 6; 2019, No. 315, § 2855.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added “nor shall more than one (1) year of service be credited any member for all service rendered by him or her in a fiscal year” at the end of (a)(2)(B).

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(1).

24-4-508. Eligibility for benefits — Retirement generally.

Any member may voluntarily retire upon his or her written application filed with the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System setting forth at what time, not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) days subsequent to the execution and filing of the application, that he or she desires to be retired if that member has:

Twenty-eight (28) or more years of credited service regardless of age;

Attained or attains age sixty (60) and has twenty (20) or more years of actual contributory service commenced prior to January 1, 1978; or

Attained or attains age sixty-five (65) and has five (5) or more years of actual service, except for a member of the General Assembly who must have ten (10) or more years of actual service if he or she only has service as a member of the General Assembly.

Total credited service to qualify for a benefit may be service with the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and service with the University of Arkansas System, which service is covered by the retirement system recognized by the University of Arkansas.

The benefit payable by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall be based on credited service in the system and on the final average compensation in the system. However, should a member have less than four (4) years of credited service in the system, “final average compensation” means the monthly average of pays to the member during his or her total years of service in the system.

An annuity determination shall be made promptly by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System upon a member's filing a written application for retirement in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.

The determination shall include the member's total years of credited service, the specific factors used to make the determination, the base annuity payable to the member, and the amount of annuity payments, if any, payable under the annuity options of § 24-4-606.

If the member is not eligible for a retirement annuity, the determination shall state the reasons for the determination.

A member's retirement election is irrevocable except under circumstances as may be permitted by the board by rule.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 10; 1959, No. 42, § 10; 1965, No. 153, § 7; 1969, No. 228, § 1; 1985, No. 938, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2510; Acts 1993, No. 1093, § 2; 1997, No. 299, § 15; 1999, No. 104, § 2; 1999, No. 627, § 1; 2001, No. 151, § 23; 2007, No. 176, § 5; 2011, No. 38, § 7;
2019, No. 315, § 2856.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (d).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (d).

24-4-509. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning eligibility for benefits — mandatory retirement, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 299, § 26. The section was derived from Acts 1957, No. 177, § 10; 1959, No. 42, § 10; 1985, No. 938, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2510.